Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.410

General contractor/construction manager procedure—Subcontract agreements.

Subcontract agreements used by the general contractor/construction manager shall not:

(1) Delegate, restrict, or assign the general contractor/construction manager's implied duty not to hinder or delay the subcontractor. Nothing in this subsection (1) prohibits the general contractor/construction manager from requiring subcontractors not to hinder or delay the work of the general contractor/construction manager or other subcontractors and to hold subcontractors responsible for such damages;

(2) Delegate, restrict, or assign the general contractor/construction manager's authority to resolve subcontractor conflicts. The general contractor/construction manager may delegate or assign coordination of specific elements of the work, including: (a) The coordination of shop drawings among subcontractors; (b) the coordination among subcontractors in ceiling spaces and mechanical rooms; and (c) the coordination of a subcontractor's lower tier subcontractors. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the general contractor/construction manager from imposing a duty on its subcontractors to cooperate with the general contractor/construction manager and other subcontractors in the coordination of the work;

(3) Restrict the subcontractor's right to damages for changes to the construction schedule or work to the extent that the delay or disruption is caused by the general contractor/construction manager or entities acting for it. The general contractor/construction manager may require the subcontractor to provide notice that rescheduling or resequencing will result in delays or additional costs;

(4) Require the subcontractor to bear the cost of trade damage repair except to the extent the subcontractor is responsible for the damage. Nothing in this subsection (4) precludes the general contractor/construction manager from requiring the subcontractor to take reasonable steps to protect the subcontractor's work from trade damage; or

(5) Require the subcontractor to execute progress payment applications that waive claims for additional time or compensation or bond or retainage rights as a condition of receipt of progress payment, except to the extent the subcontractor has received or will receive payment. Nothing in this section precludes the general contractor/construction manager from requiring the subcontractor to provide notice of claims for additional time or compensation as a condition precedent to right of recovery or to execute a full and final release, including a waiver of bond and retainage rights, as a condition of final payment.

[ 2007 c 494 s 308.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.